Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-28,117
Pharmacy; hospital pharmacy; inspection; requirements.

Effective January 1, 2025, any self-inspection of a pharmacy or a hospital pharmacy shall be made using a form authorized by the board. The board shall authorize the form for use beginning January 1, 2025, on or before November 1, 2024, and such form shall remain in effect for a period of at least one year. Any updates to the form for subsequent years shall be authorized on or before November 1 of that year. If the board fails to authorize the form on or before November 1 of any year, any inspection of a pharmacy or hospital pharmacy for the following calendar year shall be conducted by the board or department, as applicable.

Laws 2024, LB1215, § 14.